Alaska statutes. Title 14. Education, Libraries, and Museums.
Article 3. Pupil Health.

Sec. 14.30.141.
Self-administration and documentation of medication.

A public school shall permit the self-administration of medication by a pupil for asthma or anaphylaxis if, during the current school year, the pupil’s parent or guardian provides the school

written authorization for the self-administration of the medication;

written certification from the pupil’s health care provider that the pupil

has asthma or a condition that may lead to anaphylaxis;

has received instruction in the proper method of self-administration of the medication; and

has demonstrated to the health care provider the skill level necessary to use the medication and any device that is necessary to administer the medication as prescribed;

a release of liability for the school and its employees or agents for injury arising from the self-administration or storage of the medication;

an agreement to indemnify and hold harmless the school and its employees or agents for any claims arising out the self-administration or storage of the medication;

a written treatment plan for the pupil that is signed by the pupil’s health care provider for managing asthma or anaphylaxis episodes, a list and dosage of medications needed during school hours, and permission for and instruction on storage of the medication at school; and

any other documentation required by the school that is consistent with this section.

The public school shall provide written notification to the pupil’s parent or guardian of the school’s absence of liability related to the self-administration of medication under this section.

A pupil who is permitted to self-administer medication under this section shall be permitted to carry and to store with the school nurse or other designated school official an inhaler or autoinjectable epinephrine, or both, at all times.

If a student uses the student’s prescribed medication in a manner other than as prescribed, disciplinary action according to school codes may be imposed upon the student. The imposed disciplinary action may not limit or restrict the student’s immediate access to the student’s prescribed medication.

In this section, “health care provider” means a licensed physician, advanced practice registered nurse, physician assistant, village health aide, or pharmacist operating within the scope of the health care provider’s authority.

History.

(§ 1 ch 71 SLA 2005; am § 28 ch 33 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 7, 2016, in (e), substituted “advanced practice registered nurse” for “nurse practitioner”.

Sec. 14.30.142.
Concussions in student athletes: prevention and reporting.

The governing body of a school district shall consult with the Alaska School Activities Association to develop and publish guidelines and other information to educate coaches, student athletes, and parents of student athletes regarding the nature and risks of concussions. Guidelines developed under this section must include a description of the risks of return to play and standards for return to play, including the procedures required under (c) and (d) of this section.

A school shall annually provide to a student and the parent or guardian of a student who is under 18 years of age written information on the nature and risks of concussions. A student may not participate in school athletic activities unless the student and the parent or guardian of a student who is under 18 years of age have signed a verification of receipt of the information required under this subsection.

A student who is suspected of having sustained a concussion during a practice or game shall be immediately removed from the practice or game.

A student who has been removed from participation in a practice or game for suspicion of concussion may not return to participation in practice or game play until the student has been evaluated and cleared for participation in writing by an athletic trainer or other qualified person who has received training, as verified in writing or electronically by the qualified person, in the evaluation and management of concussions. In this subsection, “qualified person” means either a

health care provider who is licensed in the state or exempt from licensure under state law; or

person who is acting at the direction and under the supervision of a physician who is licensed in the state or exempt from licensure under AS

08.64.370

(1), (2), (4), or (6).

A person who conducts an evaluation under (d) of this section and who is not paid for conducting the evaluation may not be held liable for civil damages resulting from an act or omission during the evaluation, except that the person may be held liable for reckless or intentional misconduct and for gross negligence.

History.

(§ 2 ch 12 SLA 2011; am § 1 ch 49 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 28 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective May 30, 2012, in (d), added “participation in practice or game” after “not return to”, “an athletic trainer or other” following “participation in writing by”; deleted “and is currently certified” following “person who has received training”.

The 2018 amendment, effective September 16, 2018, in (d)(2), added “, or (6)” at the end, and made a related change.

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 12, SLA 2011, which enacted this section, took effect on August 25, 2011.

Sec. 14.30.143.
Concussions in student athletes: school district immunity.

A school district may not be held liable for an injury to or the death of a person caused by a concussion and resulting from the action or inaction of a person employed by or under contract with a nonprofit youth organization if

the action or inaction occurred during the delivery of services by the district or organization in compliance with AS

14.30.142

;

the organization is under contract with the district to provide the services; and

before the provision of services, the organization provided to the district written verification of

a valid insurance policy covering the injury or death in an amount not less than $50,000 for each person and $100,000 for each incident;

compliance with the protocol for prevention and reporting of concussions required in AS

14.30.142

.

This section may not be construed to impair or modify the ability of a person to recover damages for harm caused by the negligent or reckless actions of an employee or contractor of a school district or by the existence of a condition, equipment, program, or structure known by the school district or organization to be unsafe.

In this section, “youth organization” means a public or private entity qualified to do business in the state that provides a program or service to persons under 19 years of age.

History.

(§ 2 ch 12 SLA 2011)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 12, SLA 2011, which enacted this section, took effect on August 25, 2011.

Secs. 14.30.150 — 14.30.170.
Scope of article; construction; penalty for false certificates. [Repealed, § 59 ch 98 SLA 1966.]